California statutes. Fish and Game Code
A regulation which is adopted pursuant to this section shall be supported by written findings adopted by the commission at the time of the adoption of the regulation setting forth the basis for the regulation. 

A regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for not more than 12 months from its effective date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 709, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Procedure [250. - 275.]

250.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this article applies to a commission regulation that governs the take or possession of any bird, mammal, fish, amphibian, or reptile.

(b) This article does not apply to a regulation governed by subdivision (b) of Section 200 or Section 201.

(c) Except as expressly provided, this article does not supersede any other applicable law that governs the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 18.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

255.

(a) When adopting, amending, or repealing a regulation governed by this article, the commission shall conduct the following steps at separate public meetings:

(1) Approve the submission of a notice of proposed action to the Office of Administrative Law.

(2) Consider public comment on the proposed action. The department shall participate in this process by reviewing and responding to all public comment.

(3) Make a final decision on the proposed action.

(b) The meetings required by this
 section may be regular or special meetings.

(c) The meetings required by this section shall be duly noticed to the public in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 110 and the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) Within 45 days after the commission makes a final decision to adopt, amend, or repeal a regulation governed by this article, the department shall publish and distribute the regulation to each county clerk, district attorney, and judge of the superior court in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 18.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

260.

(a) The commission and the department may do anything that is deemed necessary and proper to publicize and distribute a regulation governed by this article so that persons likely to be affected will be informed of them. The failure of the commission to provide any notice of a regulation governed by this article, beyond what is required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, does not impair the validity of the regulations.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission and the department may contract with private entities to print regulations governed by this article, and other public information.
 The printing contract shall include criteria to ensure that the public information
 provided in the publication is easy to reference, read, and understand.

(c) Printing contracts authorized by this section for which no state funds are expended are not subject to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, except for Article 2 (commencing with Section 10295) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) Material printed pursuant to subdivision (b) that contains advertisements shall meet all specifications prescribed by the department. The printed material shall not contain advertisements for tobacco products, alcohol, firearms, and devices prohibited pursuant to Section 32625 of the Penal Code, Article 2 (commencing with Section 30600) of Chapter 2 of Division 10 of Title
 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, or any provision listed in Section 16590 of the Penal Code, or firearms not authorized by
 the commission as a legal method of sport hunting, political statements, solicitations for membership in organizations, or any other statement, solicitation, or product advertisement that is in conflict with the purposes for which the material is produced, as determined by the commission.

(e) Neither the department nor the commission shall contract with private entities to print the materials described in subdivision (b) if the letting of those contracts will result in the elimination of civil service positions.

(f) The department or the license agent may give a copy of the current applicable published regulations governed by this article to each person issued a license, at the time the license is issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 18.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

265.

A regulation governed by this article is not subject to the time periods for the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation prescribed in Sections 11343.4, 11346.4, 11346.8, and 11347.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 18.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

270.

The adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation governed by this article shall become effective at the time specified in the regulation, but not sooner than the date of the filing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 18.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

275.

A regulation governed by this article shall remain in effect for the period specified in the regulation or until superseded by subsequent regulation of the commission or by statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 18.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Other Regulatory Powers [301. - 398.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [301. - 317.]

301.

The commission may adopt regulations that it deems necessary for the disposition of birds or mammals that are killed accidentally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 13.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

302.

When adopting regulations pursuant to any authority otherwise vested in the commission by this code, the commission shall annually determine whether to continue, repeal, or amend regulations establishing hunting seasons for black bears. The determination shall include a review of factors which impact the health and viability of the black bear population.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 687, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

303.

Prior to adopting a regulation authorizing a special hunting season for black bears for the purpose of curtailing property damage in any specified area, the commission shall comply with Article 2 (commencing with Section 325) of Chapter 3 of Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 687, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

306.

Whenever, because of extreme fire hazard, any area is closed to entry by the public by any order or proclamation issued or concurred in by the Governor the commission may establish a season for hunting or fishing within the area. The season shall commence upon or after the expiration or termination of such closure and shall correspond in length of time as nearly as may be possible to the time during which such area was closed to hunting or fishing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

307.

(a) Whenever after due investigation the commission finds that game fish, resident or migratory birds, game or fur-bearing mammals, amphibians, or reptiles have decreased in numbers in an area, district, or portion of an area or district to the extent that a scarcity exists, the commission may reduce the daily bag limit and the possession limit on those game fish, birds, mammals, amphibians, or reptiles that are in danger of depletion, for a period of time that the commission may specify, or until new legislation addressing the scarcity becomes effective.

(b) A regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall be filed with the Secretary of State, and that filing shall be deemed a
 legal notice thereof.

(c) The regulation shall be published twice in at least one newspaper of general circulation in every county affected by the order. The publications shall be separated by a period of not less than one week and not more than two weeks. The regulation shall be posted in such public places in each county as the director may direct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 14.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

308.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, in District 22 the taking of birds, mammals, fish, amphibians, or reptiles shall be subject to regulations adopted, from time to time, by the commission, except that it is unlawful in District 22 to take birds or mammals within one-eighth mile of any gallinaceous guzzler, if the area surrounding it is posted in the manner prescribed by the commission. In the Colorado River, in District 22, the commission may adopt regulations in agreement with the proper authorities of the State of Arizona.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 2.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

308.5.

For the preservation, protection and restoration of mountain sheep and other birds and mammals in arid regions of the state, the commission, in cooperation with the agency authorized to manage the land, may prohibit any activity, including but not limited to camping, in the vicinity of waterholes, springs, seeps, and other watering places which are on public lands. The department may enter into agreements with other state and federal agencies controlling public lands for the purpose of posting such areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 869.)
-------------------------------------------

309.

(a) The commission or any person appointed by it to conduct a hearing may, in any investigation or hearing, cause the deposition of witnesses, residing within or without the state, to be taken in the manner prescribed by law for deposition in civil actions in the superior courts of this state under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and may compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and papers. The commission shall adopt regulations that afford
 procedural and substantive due process to any person whose license or permit is subject to revocation or suspension. Except upon conviction of a violation of this code or a regulation adopted pursuant to this code relating to the licensed or permitted activity and notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the commission shall not revoke or suspend any license or permit until the regulations required by this section have been adopted and approved by the Office of Administrative Law pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Any deliberation conducted by the commission, or conducted by any person appointed by the commission to conduct hearings, is deemed to be a proceeding required to be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or similar provision, within the meaning of paragraph (3)
 of subdivision (c) of Section 11126 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

310.

The commission may designate salmon spawning areas. It is unlawful to take salmon in any such spawning area, or within 250 feet of any salmon spawning station.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

312.

(a) The commission may issue a permit authorizing any member of the armed forces of the United States or any student or faculty member of an elementary or secondary school in the public school system actually assigned to, and participating in, an organized survival training course to take fish, amphibians, reptiles, birds, or mammals, except rare or endangered species, notwithstanding any other law or regulation, pursuant to the terms and conditions of that permit. A permit involving training by the armed forces of the United States shall be issued to the commanding officer of the unit having jurisdiction over the conduct of the survival training course. A permit involving training by an elementary or secondary school in the public school system
 shall be issued to the governing board or superintendent of the district having jurisdiction over that school and the conduct of the survival training course. A permit shall be applicable only to the area established for that survival training as designated by the commission in the permit and for the species and numbers designated in the permit.

(b) The commission may revise a condition of a permit if it finds revision is necessary to properly protect the fish, amphibians, reptiles, birds, or mammals in the area.

(c) The term of a permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be for not more than a calendar year.

(d) A report shall be submitted on the expiration of the permit period specified pursuant to subdivision (c), or as otherwise required by the commission, of all fish, amphibians, reptiles, birds, or
 mammals taken during the period covered by the report in each permit area. A new permit shall not be issued until the report has been submitted and an existing permit may be canceled if a report is not submitted when required by the commission.

(e) A person engaged in survival training taking a fish, amphibian, reptile, bird, or mammal pursuant to a permit issued under this section shall not use a firearm, bow and arrow, steel trap, explosive, chemical, poison, drug, net, or fish tackle, except that hooks, handlines, and improvised poles and lines may be used to take fish.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 15.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

313.

The commission may prohibit the taking or possessing of tuna in the same manner as taking or possessing tuna is prohibited by federal law or by rules or regulations adopted pursuant to the Tuna Conventions Act of 1950, as amended by Public Law 87-814 of the 87th Congress, notwithstanding any other provision of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

314.

The commission at any time may close to the taking of any species or subspecies of bird or mammal any area newly stocked by the department with resident or migratory game birds or game or fur-bearing mammals, or any area where, in the judgment of the commission, added protection for birds or mammals is needed to properly conserve the birds or mammals, for such time as the commission may designate, or until such time as new legislation thereon enacted by the Legislature may become effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1699.)
-------------------------------------------

315.

The commission may at any time close any stream, lake, or other inland waters, or portions thereof, to the taking of any species or subspecies of fish to protect and properly conserve the fish, except for the taking of fish otherwise permitted by this code under a commercial fishing license, for such time as the commission may designate, or until such time as new legislation thereon enacted by the Legislature may become effective.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 314 (as added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1439) by Stats. 1965, Ch. 137.)
-------------------------------------------

315.3.

The commission may open any stream, lake, or other inland waters, or any part of any stream, lake, or other inland waters, to the taking of any species or subspecies of fish for the proper utilization of the fish, for an amount of time specified by the commission, or until new legislation on the matter enacted by the Legislature becomes effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 3.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

316.

The commission may prohibit the taking or possessing of Pacific halibut (Hippoglossus) in the same manner as the taking or possessing of Pacific halibut is prohibited by federal law or by rules or regulations adopted by the International Pacific Halibut Commission, notwithstanding any other provision of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 996.)
-------------------------------------------

316.5.

The commission may prohibit the taking or possessing of salmon in the same manner as the taking or possessing of salmon is prohibited by federal law or by rules or regulations adopted by the United States Secretary of Commerce, notwithstanding any other provision of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

317.

Any organization conducting a special hunt for servicemen or veterans residing in or assigned to a United States veterans or armed services medical facility may apply to the commission for, and the commission may issue, under such terms and conditions as it may impose, a permit to take birds and mammals notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 2006 and 3002.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 695.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Special Seasons [325. - 330.]

325.

Whenever after due investigation the commission finds that game mammals, other than deer, and fur-bearing mammals and resident game birds have increased in numbers in any areas, districts, or portions thereof other than a refuge or preserve established by statute, to such an extent that a surplus exists, or to such an extent that the mammals or birds are damaging public or private property, or are overgrazing their range, the commission may provide by regulation, for a special hunting season for the mammals and birds, additional to, or concurrent with any other open season specified by law; or provide for increased bag limits; or remove sex restrictions specified by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

326.

Before adopting a regulation pursuant to Section 325, the commission at an open meeting shall publicly announce the contents of the proposed regulation, and fix a time and place for a hearing on the proposed regulation in each county that would be affected by the regulation. The time for each hearing shall be at least 21 days after the announcement, and the place shall be the county seat of the affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 16.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

327.

Notice of the hearing shall be published at least once, and at least 10 days prior to the hearing, in a newspaper of general circulation in each of the counties in which the hearing is to be held, or if no such newspaper is published in that county or counties then in such a newspaper in an adjoining county. The hearing shall be conducted by either (a) the commission, (b) a member of the commission designated by it, or (c) the director if requested so to do by the commission.

At least 10 days prior to the holding of any such hearing the commission shall notify each member of the board of supervisors, at his home address, of each county affected of the details of its proposed order affecting such county and the time and date of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

328.

Such employees of the department as may be necessary or are requested by any interested group of persons, shall be present at the hearing. After the hearing the commission may abandon the proposal or make a final regulation, with any modifications it deems appropriate, or without modification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

329.

The regulation may fix a license fee for special hunting and designate the number of special licenses to be issued, the area in which such hunting will be permitted, the number and sex of animals or birds that may be killed by each holder of a special license, and the conditions and regulations to govern such hunting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

330.

Cooperative hunting areas, as described in Section 1575, may be established in connection with any area opened to hunting under the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 17.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.1. Antelope and Elk [331. - 332.]

331.

(a) The commission may determine and fix the area or areas, the seasons and hours, the bag and possession limit, and the sex and total number of pronghorn antelope (Antilocapra americana) that may be taken under regulations that the commission may adopt from time to time. Only a person possessing a valid hunting license, who has not received a pronghorn antelope tag under these provisions during a period of time specified by the commission, may obtain a tag for the taking of pronghorn antelope.

(b) The department may issue a pronghorn antelope tag upon payment of a fee. The fee for a pronghorn antelope tag shall be fifty-five dollars ($55) for a resident of the state, as adjusted under Section 713. On or before July 1, 2007, the commission shall,
 by regulation, fix the fee for a nonresident of the state at not less than a fee of three hundred fifty dollars ($350), as adjusted under Section 713. The fees shall be deposited in the Big Game Management Account established in Section 3953 and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended, in addition to moneys budgeted for salaries of persons in the department as set forth in Section 3953.

(c) The commission shall direct the department to annually authorize not less than one pronghorn antelope tag or more than 1 percent of the total number of tags available for the purpose of raising funds for programs and projects to benefit pronghorn antelope. These tags may be sold at auction to residents or nonresidents of the state or by another method and are not subject to the fee limitation prescribed in subdivision (b). All revenues from sales pursuant to this subdivision
 shall be deposited in the Big Game Management Account established in Section 3953 and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended as set forth in that section.

(d) The commission shall direct the department to annually authorize one pronghorn antelope tag of the total number of tags available for issuance to nonresidents of the state. 

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 295, Sec. 2.   (AB 2151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

332.

(a) The commission may determine and fix the area or areas, the seasons and hours, the bag and possession limit, and the number of elk that may be taken under rules and regulations that the commission may adopt from time to time. The commission may authorize the taking of tule elk if the average of the department’s statewide tule elk population estimates exceeds 2,000 animals, or the Legislature determines, pursuant to the reports required by Section 3951, that suitable areas cannot be found in the state to accommodate that population in a healthy condition.

(b) Only a person possessing a valid hunting license may obtain a tag for the taking of elk.

(c) The department may issue an elk tag upon payment of a fee. The fee for an elk tag shall be one hundred sixty-five dollars ($165) for a resident of the state, as adjusted under Section 713. On or before July 1, 2007, the commission shall, by regulation, fix the fee for a nonresident of the state at not less than one thousand fifty dollars ($1,050), as adjusted under Section 713. The fees shall be deposited in the Big Game Management Account established in Section 3953 and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended, in addition to moneys budgeted for salaries of the department as set forth in Section 3953.

(d) The commission shall annually direct the department to authorize not more than three elk tags for the purpose of raising funds for programs and projects to benefit elk. These tags may be sold at
 auction to residents or nonresidents of the state or by another method and are not subject to the fee limitation prescribed in subdivision (c). All revenues from sales pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the Big Game Management Account established in Section 3953 and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended as set forth in that section.

(e) The commission shall direct the department to annually authorize one elk tag of the total number of tags available for issuance to nonresidents of the state.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 295, Sec. 4.   (AB 2151)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Migratory Birds [355. - 357.]

355.

(a) The commission may annually adopt regulations pertaining to migratory birds to conform with or to further restrict the rules and regulations prescribed pursuant to the Migratory Bird Treaty Act.

(b) Regulations adopted under this section are not subject to Sections 11343.4, 11346.1, 11346.4, and 11346.8 of the Government Code.

(c) Every regulation of the commission adopted pursuant to this article shall become effective upon filing unless otherwise specified in the regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 4.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

356.

(a) Migratory game birds may be taken in conformity with federal laws and regulations and the regulations of the commission adopted pursuant to this article.

(b) In the event no regulations are prescribed by the proper federal agency, the commission may determine and fix the area or areas, the seasons and hours, the species, the bag and possession limits, and the total number that may be taken during any open season for the taking of migratory game birds, under rules and regulations adopted by the commission. The rules and regulations shall have the same effect as if enacted by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 5.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

357.

The president of the commission may be a member ex officio of the Migratory Bird Conservation Commission created by the act of Congress known as the “Migratory Bird Conservation Act.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. California-Arizona Compact [375. - 375.]

375.

The commission may negotiate the terms of a compact between the States of Arizona and California with any appropriate officials of the State of Arizona in relation to reciprocal privileges and licenses for hunting and fishing by residents of one of the states within the territorial jurisdiction of the other. The negotiations shall include, but shall not be limited to, provisions relating to sport fishing and the hunting of migratory waterfowl in, on, or along the Colorado River.

It is the primary purpose of this section to provide a method whereby the hunting and fishing opportunities afforded by the Colorado River may be mutually enjoyed by the residents of the States of Arizona and California despite the difficulties and inconveniences that result from the fact that the boundary line between the States of Arizona and California is the middle of the channel of the Colorado River.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reciprocal Agreements With Adjoining States [390. - 393.]

390.

The commission, subject to the approval of the Attorney General, may enter into reciprocal agreements with corresponding state or county official agencies of adjoining states pertaining to the establishment of a basis whereby valid sport fishing licenses issued by the parties to the reciprocal agreements may be used by their licensees within the jurisdiction of either, in accordance with the terms of such agreements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

391.

The department may exchange or release to any appropriate federal, state, or local agency or agencies in other states, for purposes of law enforcement, any information collected or maintained by the department under any provision of this code or any regulation adopted pursuant to this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

392.

(a) The director, or a designated representative, may enter into reciprocal operational agreements with authorized representatives of any Oregon, Nevada, or Arizona state law enforcement agency, including, but not limited to, the Oregon State Police, the Nevada Department of Wildlife, and the Arizona Game and Fish Department, to promote expeditious and effective law enforcement service to the public, and assistance between the members of the department and those agencies, in areas adjacent to the borders of this state and each of the adjoining states pursuant to Section 393.

(b) The reciprocal operational agreement shall be in writing and may cover the reciprocal exchange of law enforcement services, resources, facilities, and any other necessary
 and proper matters between the department and the respective agency.

(c) Any agreement shall specify all of the following:

(1) The involved departments, divisions, or units of the agencies.

(2) The duration and purpose of the agreement.

(3) Responsibility for damages.

(4) The method of financing any joint or cooperative undertaking.

(5) The methods to be employed to terminate an agreement.

(d) The director may establish operational procedures in implementation of any reciprocal operational agreement that are necessary to achieve the purposes of the
 agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 294, Sec. 1.   (AB 1442)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

393.

(a) A regularly employed law enforcement officer of an Oregon, Nevada, or Arizona state law enforcement agency, including, but not limited to, the Oregon State Police, the Nevada Department of Wildlife, or the Arizona Game and Fish Department, is a peace officer in this state, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The officer is providing, or attempting to provide, law enforcement services within this state, within a distance of up to 50 statute miles of the contiguous border of this state and the state employing the officer, or within waters offshore of this state in the Exclusive Economic Zone.

(2) The officer is providing, or attempting to provide,
 law enforcement services pursuant to either of the following:

(A) In response to a request for services initiated by a member of the department.

(B) In response to a reasonable belief that emergency law enforcement services are necessary for the preservation of life, and a request for services by a member of the department is impractical to obtain under the circumstances. In those situations, the officer shall obtain authorization as soon as practical.

(3) The officer is providing, or attempting to provide, law enforcement services for the purpose of assisting a member of the department in response to misdemeanor or felony criminal activity, pursuant to the authority of a peace officer as provided in subdivision (e) of Section 830.2 of the Penal Code, or, in the event of an emergency incident or other similar public
 safety problem, whether or not a member of the department is present at the scene of the event.

(4) An agreement pursuant to Section 392 is in effect between the department and the agency of the adjoining state employing the officer, the officer acts in accordance with that agreement, and the agreement specifies that the officer and employing agency of the adjoining state shall be subject to the same civil immunities and liabilities as a peace officer and his or her employing agency in this state.

(5) The officer receives no separate compensation from this state for providing law enforcement services within this state.

(6) The adjoining state employing the officer confers similar rights and authority upon a member of the department who renders assistance within that state.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who is acting as a peace officer in this state in the manner described in this section shall be deemed to have met the requirements of Section 1031 of the Government Code and the selection and training standards of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, if the officer has completed the basic training required for peace officers in his or her state.

(c) A peace officer of an adjoining state shall not provide services within a California jurisdiction during a period in which officers of the department are involved in a labor dispute that results in a formal work slowdown or stoppage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 18.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Falconry [395. - 398.]

395.

(a) The commission may adopt regulations for the possession or training, and the capture, importation, exportation, or intrastate transfer, of any bird in the orders Falconiformes and Strigiformes (birds-of-prey) used in the practice of falconry and may authorize the issuance and provide for the revocation of licenses and permits to persons for the practice of falconry.

(b) It is unlawful to capture, possess, or train any bird in the orders Falconiformes and Strigiformes (birds-of-prey) in the practice of falconry without procuring a falconry license.

(c) Regulations shall not be adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) for the possession, training, capture, importation, exportation, or intrastate transfer of American peregrine falcons used in the practice of falconry unless the Legislature provides an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or another statute for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 59, Sec. 1.   (SB 147)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

396.

(a) The falconry license shall be valid for a license year beginning on July 1 and ending on the last day of June of the next succeeding calendar year. If issued after July 1 of any year, a falconry license is valid for the remainder of that license year.

(b) For the license years beginning on or after March 1, 1987, the fee for a falconry license is a base fee of thirty dollars ($30) as adjusted under Section 713.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

397.

(a) On or before three years after the date the Legislature makes an appropriation for purposes of this section, and then again on or before eight years after the date the Legislature makes an appropriation for purposes of this section, the department shall prepare a report and submit each of the reports to the relevant legislative policy and budget committees in both houses of
 the Legislature. The reports shall provide data and information regarding the status of the American peregrine falcon in the state and its use in falconry. The purpose of the reports is to provide a comprehensive overview of the impact of changes in falconry law and regulations on the practice of falconry. The reports shall include all of, but are not limited to, the following information:

(1) The regulatory status of falconry and any commission or department action related to regulatory development.

(2) (A) Compiled data regarding the use of all American peregrine falcons, including hybrids, in falconry in the state, and compiled data regarding the use of all raptors in falconry in the state.

(B) The compiled data shall be obtained from the information falconers submit to the department regarding raptor acquisition and disposition, including raptor capture, recapture, and release; possession; and hunting take pursuant to licensing. The compiled data shall be reported by species and the source of the bird, such as captive-bred, and include all take.

(C) The compiled data provided for the practice of falconry is intended to provide context for the data provided for the American peregrine falcon.

(3) Retention rates for falconers of all levels.

(4) Fee revenue from all sources related to falconry, and costs associated with falconry, including regulatory development, and to administer and implement the
 regulations by the commission and the department. 

(5) Department enforcement information, as applicable, including any violations cited.

(b) The department shall collect all relevant, appropriate, and sufficient data necessary to evaluate falconry and the impact of the change in the regulations on falconry necessary to prepare the reports, and to justify the amount of the license fees assessed, including information about data collection and enforcement costs. Data collection efforts shall avoid duplication and use data collected for other purposes, including the development of regulations, to the extent feasible.

(c) A
 report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) The implementation of this section is contingent upon an appropriation for its purposes by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 471, Sec. 2.   (SB 945)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

398.

The base year for determining the inflationary index applied to the fee established by Section 396 shall be the 1984–85 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 6.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Emergency Regulations [399. - 399.]

399.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the commission, when adopting, amending, or repealing a regulation pursuant to authority vested in it by this code, may, after at least one hearing, adopt, amend, or repeal that regulation pursuant to Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, if it makes either of the following findings:

(a) That the adoption, amendment, or repeal is necessary for the immediate conservation, preservation, or protection of birds, mammals, fish, amphibians, or reptiles, including, but not limited to, their nests or eggs.

(b) That the adoption, amendment, or repeal is necessary for the
 immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 20.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Acceptance of Federal Acts [400. - 401.]

400.
